Utah statutes.
58-37c-3.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Controlled Substance Precursor Advisory Board created
in Section 58-37c-4.
(2)  "Controlled substance precursor" includes a chemical reagent and means
any of the following:
(a)  Phenyl-2-propanone;
(b)  Methylamine;
(c)  Ethylamine;
(d)  D-lysergic acid;
(e)  Ergotamine and its salts;
(f)  Diethyl malonate;
(g)  Malonic acid;
(h)  Ethyl malonate;
(i)  Barbituric acid;
(j)  Piperidine and its salts;
(k)  N-acetylanthranilic acid and its salts;
(l)  Pyrrolidine;
(m)  Phenylacetic acid and its salts;
(n)  Anthranilic acid and its salts;
(o)  Morpholine;
(p)  Ephedrine;
(q)  Pseudoephedrine;
(r)  Norpseudoephedrine;
(s)  Phenylpropanolamine;
(t)  Benzyl cyanide;
(u)  Ergonovine and its salts;
(v)  3,4-Methylenedioxyphenyl-2-propanone;
(w)  propionic anhydride;
(x)  Insosafrole;
(y)  Safrole;
(z)  Piperonal;
(aa)  N-Methylephedrine;
(bb)  N-ethylephedrine;
(cc)  N-methylpseudoephedrine;
(dd)  N-ethylpseudoephedrine;
(ee)  Hydriotic acid;
(ff)  gamma butyrolactone (GBL), including butyrolactone, 1,2 butanolide,
2-oxanolone, tetrahydro-2-furanone, dihydro-2(3H)-furanone, and tetramethylene
glycol, but not including gamma aminobutric acid (GABA);
(gg)  1,4 butanediol;
(hh)  any salt, isomer, or salt of an isomer of the chemicals listed in
Subsections (2)(a) through (gg);
(ii)  Crystal iodine;
(jj)  Iodine at concentrations greater than 1.5% by weight in a solution or
matrix;
(kk)  Red phosphorous, except as provided in Section 58-37c-19.7;
(ll)  anhydrous ammonia, except as provided in Section 58-37c-19.9;
(mm)  any controlled substance precursor listed under the provisions of the
Federal Controlled Substances Act which is designated by the director under
the emergency listing provisions set forth in Section 58-37c-14; and
(nn)  any chemical which is designated by the director under the emergency
listing provisions set forth in Section 58-37c-14.
(3)  "Deliver," "delivery," "transfer," or "furnish" means the actual,
constructive, or attempted transfer of a controlled substance precursor.
(4)  "Matrix" means something, as a substance, in which something else
originates, develops, or is contained.
(5)  "Person" means any individual, group of individuals, proprietorship,
partnership, joint venture, corporation, or organization of any type or kind.
(6)  "Practitioner" means a physician, dentist, podiatric physician,
veterinarian, pharmacist, scientific investigator, pharmacy, hospital,
pharmaceutical manufacturer, or other person licensed, registered, or
otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to,
administer, or use in teaching, or chemical analysis a controlled substance in
the course of professional practice or research in this state.
(7) (a)  "Regulated distributor" means a person within the state who provides,
sells, furnishes, transfers, or otherwise supplies a listed controlled
substance precursor chemical in a regulated transaction.
(b)  "Regulated distributor" does not include any person excluded from
regulation under this chapter.
(8) (a)  "Regulated purchaser" means any person within the state who receives
a listed controlled substance precursor chemical in a regulated transaction.
(b)  "Regulated purchaser" does not include any person excluded from
regulation under this chapter.
(9)  "Regulated transaction" means any actual, constructive or attempted:
(a)  transfer, distribution, delivery, or furnishing by a person within the
state to another person within or outside of the state of a threshold amount
of a listed precursor chemical; or
(b)  purchase or acquisition by any means by a person within the state from
another person within or outside the state of a threshold amount of a listed
precursor chemical.
(10)  "Retail distributor" means a grocery store, general merchandise store,
drug store, or other entity or person whose activities as a distributor are
limited almost exclusively to sales for personal use:
(a)  in both number of sales and volume of sales; and
(b)  either directly to walk-in customers or in face-to-face transactions by
direct sales.
(11)  "Threshold amount of a listed precursor chemical" means any amount of a
controlled substance precursor or a specified amount of a controlled substance
precursor in a matrix; however, the division may exempt from the provisions of
this chapter a specific controlled substance precursor in a specific amount
and in certain types of transactions which provisions for exemption shall be
defined by the division by rule adopted pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(12)  "Unlawful conduct" as defined in Section 58-1-501 includes knowingly and
intentionally:
(a)  engaging in a regulated transaction without first being appropriately
licensed or exempted from licensure under this chapter;
(b)  acting as a regulated distributor and selling, transferring, or in any
other way conveying a controlled substance precursor to a person within the
state who is not appropriately licensed or exempted from licensure as a
regulated purchaser, or selling, transferring, or otherwise conveying a
controlled substance precursor to a person outside of the state and failing to
report the transaction as required;
(c)  acting as a regulated purchaser and purchasing or in any other way
obtaining a controlled substance precursor from a person within the state who
is not a licensed regulated distributor, or purchasing or otherwise obtaining
a controlled substance precursor from a person outside of the state and
failing to report the transaction as required;
(d)  engaging in a regulated transaction and failing to submit reports and
keep required records of inventories required under the provisions of this
chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter;
(e)  making any false statement in any application for license, in any record
to be kept, or on any report submitted as required under this chapter;
(f)  with the intent of causing the evasion of the recordkeeping or reporting
requirements of this chapter and rules related to this chapter, receiving or
distributing any listed controlled substance precursor chemical in any manner
designed so that the making of records or filing of reports required under
this chapter is not required;
(g)  failing to take immediate steps to comply with licensure, reporting, or
recordkeeping requirements of this chapter because of lack of knowledge of
those requirements, upon becoming informed of the requirements;
(h)  presenting false or fraudulent identification where or when receiving or
purchasing a listed controlled substance precursor chemical;
(i)  creating a chemical mixture for the purpose of evading any licensure,
reporting or recordkeeping requirement of this chapter or rules related to
this chapter, or receiving a chemical mixture created for that purpose;
(j)  if the person is at least 18 years of age, employing, hiring, using,
persuading, inducing, enticing, or coercing another person under 18 years of
age to violate any provision of this chapter, or assisting in avoiding
detection or apprehension for any violation of this chapter by any federal,
state, or local law enforcement official; and
(k)  obtaining or attempting to obtain or to possess any controlled substance
precursor or any combination of controlled substance precursors knowing or
having a reasonable cause to believe that the controlled substance precursor
is intended to be used in the unlawful manufacture of any controlled
substance.
(13)  "Unprofessional conduct" as defined in Section 58-1-102 and as may be
further defined by rule includes the following:
(a)  violation of any provision of this chapter, the Controlled Substance Act
of this state or any other state, or the Federal Controlled Substance Act; and
(b)  refusing to allow agents or representatives of the division or authorized
law enforcement personnel to inspect inventories or controlled substance
precursors or records or reports relating to purchases and sales or
distribution of controlled substance precursors as such records and reports
are required under this chapter.
